Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2783HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 896 Section 1. Section 321.194, subsection 4, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (2) To attend duly scheduled courses of instruction. 3 However, a licensee who attends a public school and resides 4 within that public school district may operate a motor vehicle 5 between the licenseeâs residence and school regardless of the 6 distance , and a licensee participating in open enrollment under 7 section 282.18 may operate a motor vehicle no more than forty 8 miles between the licenseeâs residence and school . 9